Hawaii statutes.
[§584-1] Parent and child relationship
defined. As used in this chapter, "parent and child
relationship" includes the legal relationship existing between a child and
the child's natural mother, between a child and father whose relationship as
parent and child is established under this chapter, or between a child and the
child's adoptive parents, incident to which the law confers or imposes rights,
privileges, duties, and obligations. [L 1975, c 66, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Attorney General Opinions

Cited in discussion of hanai children. Att. Gen. Op. 93-1.

Case Notes

By their plain language, §584-3 and this section do not state
that this chapter is the exclusive means by which paternity must be
established; thus, this chapter is not the exclusive means by which a
determination of paternity can be made. 99 H. 1, 52 P.3d 255.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next